Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-715. Benefit rights not subject to legal process — Definition.

As used in this section, “pension assignee” means an individual or entity that is not a designated beneficiary and:

Is assigned some or all of a benefit participant’s pension benefits by the benefit participant; or

Claims an interest in, or control over, a benefit participant’s plan benefit or an account to which a benefit participant’s plan benefit is deposited.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a benefit participant’s right to an annuity, to the return of accumulated contributions, to the annuity itself, to any annuity option, to a plan benefit, and to any other right accrued or accruing under the provisions of this act, and all moneys belonging to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, shall not be:

Subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other legal or equitable process; or

Assignable or transferable.

An employer shall have the right of setoff for any claim arising from embezzlement by, or fraud of, a benefit participant.

This subsection does not prevent the right of the system to:

Correct errors under § 24-7-205 in any manner provided by law; or

Collect any moneys due from or related to a member account associated with a benefit participant.

This subsection does not apply to the rollover of distributions as allowed under § 24-7-719.

If an inactive member is found by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state to be willfully refusing or failing to support minor dependent children of the individual in violation of a court order providing for such support, although the individual is financially able to do so, then the court may order the accumulated contributions, annuity or annuity options, or any other funds accruing under this chapter to be paid into the registry of the court for such further disposition as the court deems just and proper.

If, under the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, a court orders all, or a portion of, a person’s accumulated contributions to be paid into the registry of the court, the payment shall be made by the system to the court.

The system shall notify the person of the payment and give the person an opportunity to redeposit the amount of the payment in the system.

If the payment is not redeposited, then any system annuity otherwise payable to, or on behalf of, the person shall be reduced in the proportion that the payment bears to the person's accumulated contributions before the payment.

A pension assignee shall not use any device, transfer, or other related scheme to circumvent the prohibition against the assignment or transfer of a plan benefit.

A device, transfer, or other related scheme under subdivision (e)(1) of this section includes without limitation:

The deposit of a plan benefit into a joint account held by a benefit recipient and a pension assignee; and

A pension assignee’s authorization under a power of attorney or other instrument to access, or obtain funds from, an account to which plan benefits are deposited.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1983, No. 619, § 11; 1983, No. 665, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 2017, No. 199, §
1; 2017, No. 293, §
7.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 199 added “Definitions” to the end of the section heading; added (a), (b)(3), (b)(4) and (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote (b)(1); in (b)(2), substituted “An” for “However, the” and “benefit participant” for “member, retirant, or beneficiary”; and rewrote (d).

The 2017 amendment by No. 293, in (c), substituted “If an inactive member” for “In the event an individual is no longer an active teacher or employee of any public school district in this state, nor on leave of absence, and”, deleted “in its discretion” following “court may”, substituted “this chapter” for “the provisions of this act”, and substituted “deems” for “shall deem”.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-705.

24-7-716. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning a lump-sum payment of the reserve value of a small annuity, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 225, § 1.
The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1985, No. 805, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443.

24-7-717. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning rescission of retirement, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 224, §
1. The section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 39, § 1; 1993, No. 435, § 8; 1993, No. 478, § 1; 2001, No. 481, § 1; 2009, No. 1322, § 1.

24-7-718. Minimum financial conditions for benefit increases.

For an increase in benefit formulas to be effective, the regular annual actuarial valuation for the calendar year immediately preceding the effective date of the increase shall be based upon an investment rate assumption as recommended by the system's actuary as financially sound for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and set by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and shall indicate that up to and including a fourteen-percent-of-pay employer contribution rate is sufficient to amortize all unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities for members over a period of eighteen (18) years or less unless the required contribution rate would exceed fourteen percent (14%).

For any increase to be effective on a scheduled date, all increases scheduled for that date must collectively meet the minimum financial conditions.

On any scheduled date that the increases do not collectively meet the minimum financial conditions, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall have the authority to delay the increase until the minimum financial conditions are met.

Such delayed increase shall only be given on a July 1 and shall be the increase set out in § 24-7-713(b)(1).

History.

Acts 1991, No. 44, § 4; 2009, No. 468, § 22; 2019, No. 427, § 15.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “fourteen percent (14%)” for “twelve percent (12%)” and inserted “unless the required contribution rate would exceed fourteen percent (14%).”

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “as recommended by the system's actuary as financially sound for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and set by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “of no more than eight percent (8%)”, and substituted “eighteen (18) years” for “thirty (30) years”.

24-7-719. Rollover of distributions — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Direct rollover” means a payment by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to the eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee;

“Distributee” includes a member or former member.

The member's or former member's surviving spouse and the member's or former member's spouse or former spouse who is the alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(p), as it existed on January 1, 2011, are distributees with regard to the interest of the spouse or former spouse;

“Eligible retirement plan” means an eligible plan under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 457(b), as it existed on January 1, 2011, that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state that agrees to separately account for amounts transferred into such a plan from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System individual retirement account described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 408(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011, and an individual retirement annuity described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 408(b), as it existed on January 1, 2011, an annuity plan described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 403(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011, an annuity contract described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 403(b), as it existed on January 1, 2011, or a qualified plan described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011, that accepts the distributee's eligible rollover distribution.

The definition of “eligible retirement plan” shall also apply in the case of distribution to a surviving spouse or to a spouse or former spouse who is the alternate payee under a qualified domestic relation order, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(p), as it existed on January 1, 2011; and

“Eligible rollover distribution” means any distribution of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the distributee, except that an eligible rollover distribution does not include:

Any distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments, not less frequently than annually, made for:

The life or life expectancy of the distributee;

The joint lives or joint life expectancies of the distributee and the distributee's designated beneficiary; or

A specified period of ten (10) years or more;

Any distribution to the extent such a distribution is required under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a)(9), as it existed on January 1, 2011;

Any hardship distribution;

The portion of any other distribution or distributions that are not includible in gross income; and

Any other distribution that is reasonably expected to total less than two hundred dollars ($200) during a year.

A portion of a distribution shall not fail to be an eligible rollover distribution merely because the portion consists of after-tax employee contributions that are not includible in gross income. However, such a portion may be transferred only to an individual retirement account or annuity described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 408(a) - (b), as it existed on January 1, 2011, or to a qualified defined contribution plan described in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), or 26 U.S.C. § 403(a), as it existed on January 1, 2011, that agrees to separately account for amounts so transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of the distribution that is includible in gross income and the portion of the distribution that is not so includible.

A distributee or other eligible beneficiary receiving a distribution from the system may direct to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution that is five hundred dollars ($500) or more paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in a direct rollover.

The distribution under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section may be made:

Despite any provision of this chapter that would otherwise limit a distributee's election under this section; and

At the time and in the manner prescribed by the system.

The election under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall not be allowed for an eligible rollover distribution less than five hundred dollars ($500).

The amount under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be paid to the trustee of the eligible retirement plan.

Effective July 1, 2010, an eligible rollover distribution to a beneficiary who is not the surviving spouse of a member may be directed as provided under 26 U.S.C. § 402(c)(11) to a trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account described in 26 U.S.C. § 408(a) or to an individual retirement annuity described in 26 U.S.C. § 408(b).

Subsection (b) of this section applies to distributions made under §§ 24-7-709 — 24-7-711, 24-7-716 [repealed], 24-7-720, and 24-7-1308.

This section does not require the system to authorize a direct rollover of a distribution if:

The distribution is not eligible to be treated as a direct rollover under the Internal Revenue Code; or

The depository institution receiving the distribution is not eligible to receive a direct rollover under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 972, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 18; 2009, No. 468, § 23; 2011, No. 45, § 14; 2015, No. 87, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “eligible benefit plan” for “employer benefit plan” in (a)(1); rewrote (b); added (d); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (a)(1); inserted present (a)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and rewrote present (a)(3) and (4).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (b).

24-7-720. Lump-sum benefit — Definition.

If prior to July 1, 2007, an active member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System with five (5) or more years of actual service, including actual service for the year immediately preceding the member's death, dies in employer service before retirement, then a lump sum of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If on or after July 1, 2007, an active member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System with ten (10) or more years of actual service dies in employer service before retirement, then a lump sum of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid to the persons he or she has nominated by written designation executed and filed with the board.

If there are no designated persons who survive the member, the lump sum shall be paid to the member's estate.

If a retired member of the system dies prior to July 1, 2007, and the retired member accrued five (5) or more years of actual service, including actual service for the year immediately preceding the member's death, then a lump sum of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If a retired member of the system dies on or after July 1, 2007, and the retired member accrued ten (10) or more years of actual service, including actual service for the year immediately preceding the member's death, then a lump sum of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If there are no designated persons who survive the member, the lump sum shall be paid to the member's estate.

The amount of the lump-sum payments under this section shall be set periodically and not more often than annually by rules of the board as it determines is actuarially appropriate for the system.

For determining eligibility for the lump-sum death benefit under this section, “actual service” means service rendered in a position covered by the system.

“Actual service” does not include purchased or free credited service or reciprocal service.

A benefit enhancement provided for under this section shall not be implemented if it would cause the system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

If the system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities exceed an eighteen-year amortization, a benefit enhancement provided for under this section shall not be implemented until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

Pursuant to the board's fiduciary duty, the board shall implement this benefit provision for lump-sum payments by either making the lump-sum payments directly from the system or by purchasing a group life insurance policy for the benefit of system members.

A lump-sum payment under this subsection is intended to be exempt from income tax.

Effective July 1, 2009, a retired member of the system who retired on or before July 1, 2007, and had five (5) or more years of actual service credited in his or her account at retirement shall have the lump-sum death benefit paid upon the retired member's death under subsection (b) of this section.

A lump-sum payment under this section is intended to be exempt from income tax.

For eligibility under this section, a member is considered active for an additional fiscal year following the last fiscal year that the member renders actual service in a position reported to the system by a covered employer and the member obtains at least one-fourth (¼) year of service credit.

If a member accrues a minimum of fifteen (15) years of actual, contributory service, regardless of noncontributory service accrued in combination with the contributory service, the member shall receive the maximum lump-sum death benefit as determined by the board under this section.

Upon the member's death, the lump-sum death benefit shall be paid to persons the member selects by written designation executed and filed with the board.

The board may set a lump-sum benefit for noncontributory service as the board deems appropriate.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1022, § 1; 1999, No. 312, § 1; 2001, No. 359, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 494, § 4; 2007, No. 296, § 1; 2009, No. 425, § 1; 2009, No. 1323, § 1; 2011, No. 45, § 15; 2011, No. 137, § 4; 2011, No. 977, § 1; 2013, No. 140, §§ 6, 7; 2019, No. 427, § 16.

Amendments.

The 2009 by No. 425 amendment added (g).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1323 deleted (a)(1)(C), (a)(1)(D), and (a)(3); rewrote (a)(2), (b), (c), and (f); and added (g).

The 2011 amendment by No. 45 deleted “exact” following “The” near the beginning of (c).

The 2011 amendment by No. 137 added (i).

The 2011 amendment by No. 977 added (j).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1)(B), deleted “including actual service for the year immediately preceding the member's death” following “actual service,” substituted “the persons” for “such persons as,” and deleted “duly” following “designation”; and, in (i), substituted “service in a position reported to the system by” for “service to” and inserted “the member” preceding “obtains.”

The 2019 amendment rewrote (e).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 1022, codified as this section.

24-7-721 — 24-7-724. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning increases in monthly benefits and limitation on benefit enhancement of Acts 1997, No. 442 and Acts 1997, No. 992, were repealed by Acts 2009, No. 468, § 24. They were derived from the following sources:

24-7-721. Acts 1997, No. 442, § 1.

24-7-722. Acts 1997, No. 442, § 2.

24-7-723. Acts 1997, No. 992, § 4; 1999, No. 31, § 1.

24-7-724. Acts 1997, No. 992, § 5.

24-7-725. Limitation on benefit enhancement of § 24-7-702.

A benefit enhancement provided by § 24-7-702 shall not be implemented if it would cause unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

If the system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities exceed an eighteen-year amortization, a benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-7-702 shall not be implemented until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1074, § 2; 2019, No. 427, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-726. Computation of benefits based on contract salary.

If a person employed in a public school district of this state has received an actual salary reduced below the contract salary due to military service or other government service, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall compute retirement benefits based upon the contract salary and not the reduced salary resulting from the military service or other government service, provided that the system receives the employee and employer contributions in effect at the time service is rendered, plus interest, on the difference between the actual salary and the contract salary.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 906, § 1.

24-7-727. Compounded cost of living adjustments.

After July 1, 1999, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may compound the cost of living adjustment for all retirants and participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan who have received a monthly retirement benefit for the prior twelve-month period.

The amount of the benefit under this section shall be redetermined effective each July 1, and the redetermined amount shall be payable for the ensuing year.

The simple cost of living adjustment is not payable in the year or years that the board implements the compounded cost of living adjustment.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding June 30 increased by three percent (3%).

The redetermined amount shall become the base amount for determining all future cost of living adjustments.

The board may reverse a compounding of the cost of living adjustment for all retirants and participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan who benefit from the compounding.

If a compounding of the cost of living adjustment is reversed the simple cost of living adjustment shall be used for the year that the compounded cost of living adjustment was reversed and future benefits shall be paid based on the simple cost of living adjustment.

The future benefits of a member shall not be reduced to recover any additional benefits paid from the date the board uses a compounding cost of living adjustment to the date the board uses a simple cost of living adjustment.

If a compounding cost of living adjustment is reversed, the reversal shall be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year.

The compounding cost of living adjustment set by the board shall remain in effect until adjusted or reversed by the board.

The board may change the compounding of the cost of living adjustment by resolution at a meeting of the board subject to the limitations under subdivision (b)(6) of this section.

The board shall not reverse a compounding cost of living adjustment unless the:

Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's actuary certifies to the board that the amortization period to pay the unfunded liabilities of the system exceeds eighteen (18) years; and

Board determines by board resolution that reversal of the compounding cost of living adjustment that occurred in 2009 is prudent to maintain actuarial soundness.

A board resolution reversing a compounding cost of living adjustment under subdivision (b)(6) of this section may include a chart or proxy formula to be applied when a member has a change in his or her benefits due to divorce, remarriage, or the death of the member or the member's spouse.

The board may phase in the reversal of a compounding cost of living adjustment under subdivision (b)(6) of this section by board resolution.

Any reversal of a compounding cost of living adjustment under subdivision (b)(6) of this section shall be applied at the beginning of the fiscal year.

The benefit provisions provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be implemented according to rules of the board as is actuarially appropriate for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Before increasing a benefit under this section, the board shall file relevant information concerning the actuarial appropriateness of the action with the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 404, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 25; 2011, No. 45, § 16; 2013, No. 967, § 1; 2017, No. 780, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted (a)(3), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and rewrote (a)(1); inserted (b)(2) and redesignated the remaining text; divided (c) into (c) and (d); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “and participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan” in (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment inserted (b)(3) through (6).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (b)(6); and added (b)(7) and (8).

24-7-728. Computation of benefits based on life annuity.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is authorized by this section to raise the level of benefit to the current retirants and other beneficiaries of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to a comparable level increase to match the increase in benefits that would accrue to active members as a result of any increase in the calculation of a life annuity as provided in § 24-7-705(a)(1)
in accordance with any rules the board might promulgate. The amount of any increase for retirants and other beneficiaries shall also be determined in accordance with the rules of the board as is actuarially appropriate for the system. Prior to increasing a benefit as provided in this section, the board shall file relevant information concerning the actuarial appropriateness of the action with the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, and the action shall be reviewed by the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 396, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2891.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” twice.

24-7-729. Adjustment of § 24-7-713 base amount.

The base amount in § 24-7-713 will be adjusted at the same time a benefit increase is granted to active members under § 24-7-728.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 396, § 3.

24-7-730. Required distributions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter regarding the required dates of distribution of benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to former members, the distribution of a former member's benefits under the system shall in any event be made or begun by April 1 of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy and one-half (70½) or the calendar year in which the member retires.

Distributions shall be made over the life of the member or over the lives of the member and the member's designated beneficiary or over a period not extending beyond the life expectancy of the member or the life expectancy of the member and the member's designated beneficiary.

If the member dies after the distribution of benefits under the system commences, the distribution of the benefits shall be continued in accordance with the form of benefit in effect prior to the member's death.

If the member dies before the distribution of benefits under the system commences, the entire death benefit, if any, due as a result of the member's death shall be distributed no later than five (5) years after the member's death except to the extent that a written election is made to receive distributions in accordance with subdivisions (b)(2)(B) or (C) of this section.

If any portion of the member's benefit is payable to a designated beneficiary, distributions shall be made in substantially equal installments over the life or life expectancy of the designated beneficiary commencing no later than one (1) year after the member's death.

If the designated beneficiary is the member's surviving spouse, the date distributions required to begin in accordance with subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not be earlier than the date on which the member would have attained age seventy and one-half (70½). If the spouse dies before payments begin, subsequent distributions shall be made as if the spouse had been the member.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, all distributions of benefits under the system shall comply with the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and the regulations under the Internal Revenue Code, including United States Treasury Regulation, 26 C.F.R. § 1.401(a)(9)-2 and those provisions shall override any distribution options in this chapter that are inconsistent with section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9).

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 4; 2005, No. 71, § 3.

24-7-731. Forfeitures.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, any forfeitures arising from severance of employment, death, or for any other reason shall not be applied to increase the benefit any member would otherwise receive under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System at any time prior to the termination of the system or the complete discontinuance of employer contributions thereunder.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 4.

24-7-732. System termination or discontinuance — Vesting.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, members' accrued benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be one hundred percent (100%) vested:

To the extent those benefits are then funded, in the event there is a partial or complete termination of the system or in the event of a complete discontinuance of employer contributions to the system; and

Upon a member's attaining normal retirement age.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 4; 2011, No. 45, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added “Vesting” to the end of the section heading; subdivided the section by inserting the (1) designation; and added (2).

24-7-733. Limitation on benefits.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, benefits paid under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall not exceed the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 415, that are applicable to governmental retirement plans, including without limitation the dollar limitations in of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 415(b)(1)(A).

The annual benefits, as may be increased in subsequent years, that are paid to retirants by the system shall not violate the limitations under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 415(b), applicable to the annuity effective date under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 415(d), and benefits shall be paid in a manner that protects the tax-qualified status of the system.

For purposes of determining compliance with the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 415, “compensation” is defined as set forth in United States Treasury Regulation, 26 C.F.R. § 1.415-2(d)(2), as it existed on January 1, 2009, and includes any amount that is not includible in the gross income of the member under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 132(f)(4), as it existed on January 1, 2011.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 4; 2005, No. 71, § 4; 2009, No. 1202, § 1; 2011, No. 45, § 18; 2015, No. 301, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted (a)(2) and redesignated the existing text accordingly; made a minor stylistic change in (a)(1); and rewrote (b).

The 2011 amendment added “and includes any amount that is not includible in the gross income of the member under section 132(f)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on January 1, 2011,” at the end of (b).

The 2015 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “violate” for “exceed” and added “and benefits shall be paid in a manner that protects the tax-qualified status of the system.”

24-7-734. Lost payees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter, each member and each beneficiary of a deceased member shall file with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System from time to time in writing the post office address and each change of post office address of the member or beneficiary.

Any communication addressed to a member or beneficiary at the last address filed with the board or, if no address has been filed, then at the last address as indicated on the records of the employer of the member or beneficiary, shall be binding on the member or beneficiary for all purposes of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, and neither the board nor the system shall be obligated to search for or ascertain the whereabouts of any member or beneficiary.

If the board is unable within five (5) years after payment of a benefit is due to a member or beneficiary to make the payment because it cannot ascertain the whereabouts of the member or the identity and whereabouts of the beneficiary or personal representative by mailing to the last known address shown on the board's records and neither the member, the beneficiary, or personal representative has submitted the paperwork and forms required by the system before the expiration of the five (5) years, then, and in each case, the board shall direct that the amount shall be forfeited to the trust assets of the system.

If the final payment is not delivered in the normal course of business, then the total payment is sent in the following order until delivered:

To the member's residual beneficiary, if any;

To the member's lump-sum death beneficiary, if any;

To the member's estate, if any; or

To the system.

If a provision of this section conflicts with a provision of the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et seq., the provision of this section supersedes the conflicting provision of the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 4; 2005, No. 385, § 9; 2013, No. 140, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “submitted the paperwork and forms required by the system” for “made written claim therefor,” and “system” for “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System”; and rewrote (b)(2).

24-7-735. Contract buyout agreement — Settlements — Judgments — Calculation of benefits.

A member shall not accumulate service credit in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System during the time that payments under a contract buyout agreement, settlement, claim, judgment, arbitration award, decree, or court-ordered payment are paid to the member by the employer unless the member continues to work on-site for the employer.

The employer shall provide a copy of a settlement agreement or court order under this section to the system so that the system can prevent the accumulation of service credit for any payments that are not for on-site work for the employer.

A member shall not receive service credit or additional salary from the system under a settlement agreement or court order unless permitted under this section.

The system shall allow a member or employer to purchase service credit or additional salary for the member for salary that should have been paid under a settlement agreement or court order to resolve a claim of wrongful termination or the underpayment of salary that should have been paid if the service credit is:

Purchased as additional salary by an employer or member to be added to the final average salary of the member calculated at the time of the purchase.

The member's official salary record shall include the purchased additional salary years which may be used to compute the final average salary at the time of retirement if the salary in any of the additional purchased salary years qualifies for the final average salary calculation.

Service credit earned by the member from an employer from the date of termination by an employer to the date of the settlement agreement or court order shall be subtracted from the amount of service credit allowed for purchase under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section; and

Paid using the actuarial equivalent, as calculated by the system, of the member's benefits to the system.

The system shall use the same factors as used to determine the cost of the additional salary purchase to calculate an additional monthly benefit in the annuitization of a Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan distribution.

The calculation shall be made with the assumption that the member would have immediately retired at the time of the additional salary purchase.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 163, § 2; 2013, No. 521, § 2; 2017, No. 436, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading; inserted “settlement, claim, judgment, arbitration award, decree” in (a); substituted “to the member on which the employer is required to withhold federal income tax” for “under subsection (a) of this section” in (b); and added (c) and (d).

The 2017 amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote present (b)(1) and inserted “additional” in (b)(2); in the introductory language of (c), inserted “or employer”, “or additional salary for the member for salary that should have been paid”, and “or the underpayment of salary that should have been paid”; rewrote (c)(1)(A)(i); added (c)(1)(A)(ii); substituted “(c)(1)(A)” for “(d)” in (c)(1)(B); and added (d).